test/src/morphology/N-iskwew_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Verb - iskwêw - ok : # -m animate noun
     iskwêw+N+AN+Sg: iskwêw
     iskwêw+N+AN+Pl: iskwêwak
     iskwêw+N+AN+Loc: iskwênâhk
     
     iskwêw+N+AN+Sg+Px1Sg: nitiskwêw
     iskwêw+N+AN+Sg+Px2Sg: kitiskwêw
     iskwêw+N+AN+Sg+Px3Sg: otiskwêw
     iskwêw+N+AN+Sg+Px3iSg: otiskwêwiyiw
     iskwêw+N+AN+Sg+Px1Pl: nitiskwêwnân
     iskwêw+N+AN+Sg+Px12Pl: kitiskwêwnân
     iskwêw+N+AN+Sg+Px2Pl: kitiskwêwâw
     iskwêw+N+AN+Sg+Px3Pl: otiskwêwâw
     iskwêw+N+AN+Sg+Px3iPl: otiskwêwiyiw
     
     iskwêw+N+AN+Pl+Px1Sg: nitiskwêwak
     iskwêw+N+AN+Pl+Px2Sg: kitiskwêwak
     iskwêw+N+AN+Pl+Px3Sg: otiskwêwa
     iskwêw+N+AN+Pl+Px3iSg: otiskwêwiyiwa
     iskwêw+N+AN+Pl+Px1Pl: nitiskwêwinânak
     iskwêw+N+AN+Pl+Px12Pl: kitiskwêwnawak
     iskwêw+N+AN+Pl+Px2Pl: kitiskwêwiwâwak
     iskwêw+N+AN+Pl+Px3Pl: otiskwêwâwa
     iskwêw+N+AN+Pl+Px3iPl: otiskwêwyiwa
     
     iskwêw+N+AN+Dim+Sg: iskwêsis
     iskwêw+N+AN+Dim+Pl: iskwêwsisak
     iskwêw+N+AN+Dim+Sg+Px1Sg: nitiskwêsis
     iskwêw+N+AN+Dim+Sg+Px2Sg: kitiskwêsis
     iskwêw+N+AN+Dim+Sg+Px3Sg: otiskwêsis
     iskwêw+N+AN+Dim+Sg+Px3iSg: otiskwêsisiyiw
     iskwêw+N+AN+Dim+Sg+Px1Pl: nitiskwêsisnân
     iskwêw+N+AN+Dim+Sg+Px12Pl: kitiskwêsisnân
     iskwêw+N+AN+Dim+Sg+Px2Pl: kitiskwêsisâw
     iskwêw+N+AN+Dim+Sg+Px3Pl: otiskwêsisâw
     iskwêw+N+AN+Dim+Sg+Px3iPl: otiskwêsisiyiw
     
     iskwêw+N+AN+Dim+Pl+Px1Sg: nitiskwêwsisak
     iskwêw+N+AN+Dim+Pl+Px2Sg: kitiskwêwsisak
     iskwêw+N+AN+Dim+Pl+Px3Sg: otiskwêwsisa
     iskwêw+N+AN+Dim+Pl+Px3iSg: otiskwêwsisiyiwa
     iskwêw+N+AN+Dim+Pl+Px1Pl: nitiskwêwsisinânak
     iskwêw+N+AN+Dim+Pl+Px12Pl: kitiskwêwsisnawak
     iskwêw+N+AN+Dim+Pl+Px2Pl: kitiskwêwsisiwâwak
     iskwêw+N+AN+Dim+Pl+Px3Pl: otiskwêwsiswâwa
     iskwêw+N+AN+Dim+Pl+Px3iPl: otiskwêwsisyiwa
